Indiana, session 2026, HB1418.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-28-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.194-2025,
SECTION 1, AND P.L.214-2025, SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a)
Subsection (b) does not apply to an individual who:
(1) held an Indiana limited, reciprocal, or standard teaching
license on June 30, 1985; or
(2) is granted a license under section 12.5, 16.5, or 18 of this
chapter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (f) and sections 12.5 and 16.5
of this chapter, the department may not grant an initial practitioner
license to an individual unless the individual has:
(1) met the requirements of section 12.3 of this chapter; and
(2) demonstrated proficiency in the following areas on a written
examination or through other procedures prescribed by the
department:
(A) Pedagogy.
(B) Knowledge of the areas in which the individual is required
2026 IN 1418—LS 6261/DI 152


to have a license to teach.
(C) If the individual is seeking to be licensed as an elementary
school teacher, comprehensive scientifically based reading
instruction skills aligned to the science of reading.
(c) An individual's license examination score may not be disclosed
by the department without the individual's consent unless specifically
required by state or federal statute or court order.
(d) Subject to section 22 of this chapter, the state board shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to do the following:
(1) Adopt, validate, and implement the examination or other
procedures required by subsection (b).
(2) Establish examination scores indicating proficiency.
(3) Otherwise carry out the purposes of this section.
(e) Subject to section 18 of this chapter, the state board shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing the conditions under which the
requirements of this section may be waived for an individual holding
a valid teacher's license issued by another state.
(f) An individual seeking an initial practitioner license under
this chapter is exempt from the requirements under subsection
(b)(2)(B) if the individual meets the following criteria:
(1) The individual holds at least a bachelor's degree with a
grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 point scale from an
accredited postsecondary institution in the content or a
related area in which the individual wishes to teach.
(2) The individual is seeking a license in any of the following
content areas:
(A) Physical education, music, or art for a kindergarten
through grade 12 license.
(B) English/language arts, mathematics, reading, or health
for a grade 7 through grade 12 license.
2026 IN 1418—LS 6261/DI 152